Washington statutes.
RCW 35.59.090

Counties authorized to establish community centers.

Counties may establish multi-purpose community centers, pursuant to this chapter, in unincorporated areas and/or within cities or towns: PROVIDED, That no such center shall be located in any city or town without the prior consent of the legislative body of such city or town.

[ 1967 c 110 s 9.]